Maine, session 132, LD1681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5903, sub-§8-A, as amended by PL 2001, c. 90, §3, is further
amended to read:
8-A. Public service infrastructure. "Public service infrastructure" means those
facilities that are essential for public health, welfare and safety. Those facilities include,
without limitation, sewage treatment facilities, municipal water supply and treatment
facilities, solid waste facilities, public safety equipment and facilities, roads, traffic control
devices and other transportation facilities, sidewalks, trees, buried utility lines and other
streetscape improvements, parks and other open space or recreational areas, public access
to coastal and inland waters, geographic information systems, municipal shelter facilities
and housing projects managed and operated by a municipality or a municipal housing
authority, as defined in section 4702, subsection 10-A, and any other public facility that
benefits the public.
Page 1 - 132LR1279(03)